Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.686

Precollege coursework—When required—Use of multiple measures—Posting course placement options.

State universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may use multiple measures to determine whether a student must enroll in a precollege course including, but not limited to, placement tests, the SAT, high school transcripts, college transcripts, or initial class performance. Additionally, state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College must post all the available options for course placement on their websites and in their admissions materials.

[ 2015 c 83 s 1.]